District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.89

Proclaimed corporation — Reservation of name.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 299, Pub. L. 87-569, § 89
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-301.89.
1981 Ed., § 29-590.
1973 Ed., § 29-1089.

Prior Codifications